Utah statutes.
20A-16-401.   Methods of applying for military-overseas ballots.

(1)  A covered voter who is registered to vote in the state may apply for a military-overseas ballot using:

(a)  an absentee ballot application under Section 20A-3-304; or

(b) (i)  the federal postcard application; or

(ii)  the federal postcard application's electronic equivalent.

(2)  A covered voter who is not registered to vote in this state may use a federal postcard application or the federal postcard application's electronic equivalent to apply simultaneously to register to vote under Section 20A-16-302 and for a military-overseas ballot.

(3) (a)  The lieutenant governor shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described in Subsection 20A-16-201(3) is capable of accepting the submission of both a federal postcard application and any other approved electronic military-overseas ballot application sent to the appropriate election official.

(b)  The voter may use the electronic transmission system or any other approved method to apply for a military-overseas ballot.

(4)  A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot as an application for a military-overseas ballot simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in absentee ballot, if the declaration is received by the appropriate election official by the Friday immediately before the election.

(5)  To receive the benefits of this chapter, a covered voter shall inform the appropriate election official that the voter is a covered voter by:

(a)  the use of a federal postcard application or federal write-in absentee ballot;

(b)  the use of an overseas address on an approved voter registration application or ballot application; or

(c)  the inclusion on an approved voter registration application or ballot application of other information sufficient to identify the voter as a covered voter.

(6)  This chapter does not preclude a covered voter from voting under Chapter 3, Part 3, Absentee Voting.

